Louisiana, session 2026, HB336.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 927.2 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 927.2. Unexhausted claims
A. A petitioner shall file an unexhausted claim in the state district court for
the parish in which the petitioner was convicted within thirty days of the granting of
a stay from a federal court if all of the following have occurred:
(1) The petitioner failed to raise a claim for post conviction relief in state
district court.
(2) The petitioner raised a claim for post conviction relief in a petition for
a federal habeas corpus proceeding.
(3) A federal court stayed the habeas corpus proceeding to allow the
petitioner to exhaust the claim in state district court.
B. An application that raises an unexhausted claim shall establish all of the
following:
(1) That the petitioner had good cause for failing to raise the claim in prior
post conviction applications.
(2) That the claim is not plainly without merit.
(3) That the petitioner has not intentionally engaged in any dilatory litigation
tactics.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 336 ENROLLED
C. The failure of the petitioner to satisfy any requirement in Paragraph A or
B of this Article shall result in dismissal of the application.
D. The provisions of Articles 926 and 927.1 shall apply to any application
that is filed pursuant to this Article.
E. The state district court shall expedite its consideration and resolution of
an unexhausted claim.
F. If any party invokes the supervisory jurisdiction of the Louisiana Supreme
Court to review the state district court's resolution of the unexhausted claim, the
Louisiana Supreme Court shall give priority consideration to and expedite its review
of the claim.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.